Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.210

Pest control consultant licenses—Required—Exemptions.

(1) No individual may perform services as a pest control consultant without obtaining a license from the director. The license expires annually on a date set by rule by the director. Application for a license must be on a form prescribed by the director and must be accompanied by a fee of sixty-eight dollars.

(2) The following are exempt from the licensing requirements of this section when acting within the authorities of their existing licenses issued under chapter 17.21 RCW: Licensed commercial pesticide applicators and operators; licensed private-commercial applicators; and licensed demonstration and research applicators. The following are also exempt from the licensing requirements of this section: Employees of federal, state, county, or municipal agencies when acting in their official governmental capacities; and pesticide dealer managers and employees working under the direct supervision of the pesticide dealer manager and only at a licensed pesticide dealer's outlet.

[ 2021 c 244 s 5; 2008 c 285 s 19; 2003 c 212 s 4; 2000 c 96 s 9; 1997 c 242 s 6; 1992 c 170 s 3. Prior: 1991 c 264 s 4; 1991 c 109 s 39; 1989 c 380 s 16; 1983 c 95 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.